asdf/dicionarios/pt_pt.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY '-ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzÁÂÉÍÓÚàáâãçèéêíóôõú
FLAG NUMBER

PFX 1 Y 1
PFX 1   0     re         .

PFX 2 Y 4
PFX 2   0               anti            [^hirs]         PFSEM=anti+
PFX 2   0               antir           r               PFSEM=anti+
PFX 2   0               antis           s               PFSEM=anti+
PFX 2   0               anti-           [hi]            PFSEM=anti+

PFX 3 Y 1
PFX 3   0     de          .

PFX 4 Y 1
PFX 4   0     dis         .

PFX 5 Y 1
PFX 5   0               pré-            .               PFSEM=pre+

PFX 6 Y 1
PFX 6   0     con         .

PFX 7 Y 3
PFX 7   0               ultra           .               PFSEM=ultra+
PFX 7   0               super           .               PFSEM=super+
PFX 7   0               hiper           .               PFSEM=hiper+

PFX 8 Y 1
PFX 8   0     in         .

PFX 9 Y 4
PFX 9   0               in              [^plmr]         PFSEM=not+
PFX 9   0               im              p               PFSEM=not+
PFX 9   0               i               [lm]            PFSEM=not+
PFX 9   0               ir              r               PFSEM=not+

PFX 10 Y 1
PFX 10   0     pro         .

PFX 11 Y 1
PFX 11   0               pós-            .               PFSEM=pos+

PFX 12 Y 2
PFX 12   0               re              [^s]            PFSEM=outra+
PFX 12   0               res             s               PFSEM=outra+

PFX 13 Y 2
PFX 13   0               des             [^h]            PFSEM=not+
PFX 13   h               des             h               PFSEM=not+

PFX 14 Y 6
PFX 14   0               bi              .               PFSEM=2+
PFX 14   0               tris            s               PFSEM=3+
PFX 14   0               tri             [^s]            PFSEM=3+
PFX 14   0               tetra           .               PFSEM=4+
PFX 14   0               penta           .               PFSEM=5+
PFX 14   0               hexa            .               PFSEM=6+

PFX 15 Y 1
PFX 15   0     un         .

PFX 16 Y 1
PFX 16   0               vice-           .               PFSEM=vice+

PFX 17 Y 2
PFX 17   0               sub-            [bhr]           PFSEM=sub+
PFX 17   0               sub             [^bhr]          PFSEM=sub+

PFX 18 Y 1
PFX 18   0               ex-             .               PFSEM=ex+

REP 121
REP nt n't
REP alot a_lot
REP avengence a_vengeance
REP ninties 1990s
REP teached taught
REP rised rose
REP a ei
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP air are
REP air ere
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ear are
REP ear air
REP ear ere
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP ch te
REP te ch
REP ch ti
REP ti ch
REP ch tu
REP tu ch
REP ch s
REP s ch
REP ch k
REP k ch
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP gh f
REP f gh
REP i igh
REP igh i
REP i uy
REP uy i
REP i ee
REP ee i
REP j di
REP di j
REP j gg
REP gg j
REP j ge
REP ge j
REP s ti
REP ti s
REP s ci
REP ci s
REP k cc
REP cc k
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP kw qu
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP o ew
REP ew o
REP oo ew
REP ew oo
REP ew ui
REP ui ew
REP oo ui
REP ui oo
REP ew u
REP u ew
REP oo u
REP u oo
REP u oe
REP oe u
REP u ieu
REP ieu u
REP ue ew
REP ew ue
REP uff ough
REP oo ieu
REP ieu oo
REP ier ear
REP ear ier
REP ear air
REP air ear
REP w qu
REP qu w
REP z ss
REP ss z
REP shun tion
REP shun sion
REP shun cion
REP tion ssion
REP ys ies
REP u ough
REP por pro
REP pre per
REP damente mente
REP mente damente
REP iz íz
REP cao ção
REP ç ss
REP ss ç
REP c ss
REP ss c
REP ch x
REP x ch
REP cç x
REP x cç
REP íti ití
REP ití íti
REP issí íssi
REP ilí íli
REP íli ilí
REP ífi ifí
REP ifí ífi
REP nume mune
REP coen quen
REP concerteza com_certeza

SFX 19 Y 3
SFX 19   0     able       [^aeiou]
SFX 19   0     able       ee
SFX 19   e     able       [^aeiou]e

SFX 20 Y 2
SFX 20   r               damente         [ia]r           +FSEM=vmente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 20   er              idamente        er              +FSEM=vmente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo

SFX 21 Y 6
SFX 21   ionar           ção             cionar          +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX 21   ir              cção            air             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX 21   ir              ção             uir             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX 21   ionar           ções            cionar          +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao
SFX 21   ir              cções           air             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao
SFX 21   ir              ções            uir             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao

SFX 22 Y 4
SFX 22   0     d          e
SFX 22   y     ied        [^aeiou]y
SFX 22   0     ed         [^ey]
SFX 22   0     ed         [aeiou]y

SFX 23 Y 4
SFX 23   r               dor             [aei]r          +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s,FSEM=dor
SFX 23   r               dora            [aei]r          +CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=dor
SFX 23   r               dores           [aei]r          +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=p,FSEM=dor
SFX 23   r               doras           [aei]r          +CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dor

SFX 24 Y 2
SFX 24   e     ing        e
SFX 24   0     ing        [^e]

SFX 25 Y 29
SFX 25   o               ice             [^çgc]o         +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   ço              cice            ço              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   go              guice           go              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   co              quice           co              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   a               ice             [^çgc]a         +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   ça              cice            ça              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   ga              guice           ga              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   ca              quice           ca              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   e               ice             e               +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   0               ice             r               +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   0               ice             [^v][^q]l       +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   vel             bilice          [^áí]vel        +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   ável            abilice         ável            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   ível            ibilice         ível            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   z               cice            z               +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   o               ices            [^çgc]o         +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   ço              cices           ço              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   go              guices          go              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   co              quices          co              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   a               ices            [^çgc]a         +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   ça              cices           ça              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   ga              guices          ga              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   ca              quices          ca              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   0               ices            [^v][^q]l       +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   e               ices            e               +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   0               ices            r               +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   vel             bilices         [^áí]vel        +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   ável            abilices        ável            +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX 25   ível            ibilices        ível            +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice

SFX 26 N 2
SFX 26   y     ieth       y
SFX 26   0     th         [^y]

SFX 27 Y 39
SFX 27   úrgico          urgicamente     úrgico          +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   0               amente          dor             +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ório            oriamente       ório            +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ário            ariamente       ário            +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ático           aticamente      ático           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   áctico          acticamente     áctico          +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ónico           onicamente      ónico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ógico           ogicamente      ógico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ífero           iferamente      ífero           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ético           eticamente      ético           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ístico          isticamente     ístico          +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   íssimo          issimamente     íssimo          +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ítico           iticamente      ítico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   áfico           aficamente      áfico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   étrico          etricamente     étrico          +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ómico           omicamente      ómico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   érico           ericamente      érico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ótico           oticamente      ótico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   áceo            aceamente       áceo            +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ástico          asticamente     ástico          +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ício            iciamente       ício            +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ífico           ificamente      ífico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   íaco            iacamente       íaco            +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ólico           olicamente      ólico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   órico           oricamente      órico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   énico           enicamente      énico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ódico           odicamente      ódico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ópico           opicamente      ópico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   álico           alicamente      álico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   érmico          ermicamente     érmico          +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ívoro           ivoramente      ívoro           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ábico           abicamente      ábico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ófilo           ofilamente      ófilo           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   élico           elicamente      élico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   émico           emicamente      émico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ónio            oniamente       ónio            +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ásico           asicamente      ásico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ágico           agicamente      ágico           +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX 27   ócil            ocilmente       ócil            +FSEM=mente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo

SFX 28 Y 2
SFX 28   e     ings       e
SFX 28   0     ings       [^e]
